District of Columbia statutes.
22-1007

Impounded animals to be supplied with food and water.

Any person who shall impound, or cause to be impounded in any pound, any creature, shall supply the same, during such confinement, with a sufficient quantity of good and wholesome food and water; and in default thereof shall, upon conviction, be punished for every such offense in the same manner provided in § 22-1001.

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 137, ch. 106, § 7
1981 Ed., § 22-807.
1973 Ed., § 22-807.